Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.270

Subpoenas—Witness fees.

The director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and/or production of books, documents and records in the county in which the person licensed under this chapter resides in any hearing affecting the authority or privilege granted by a license, registration or permit issued under the provisions of this chapter. Witnesses shall be entitled to fees for attendance and travel, as provided for in chapter 2.40 RCW as enacted or hereafter amended.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 27.]